hr-HR: Sustav smanjenja buke: Dolby B; Dolby C; Dolby S; HX Pro; Nema; dbx; Ostalo
th: ระบบลดเสียงรบกวน: Dolby B; Dolby C; Dolby S; HX Pro; ไม่มี; dbx; อื่นๆ
pt-PT: Sistema de redução de ruído: Dolby B; Dolby C; Dolby S; HX Pro; Nenhum; dbx; Outro
nl: Ruisonderdrukkingssysteem: Dolby B; Dolby C; Dolby S; HX Pro; Geen; dbx; Andere
cs: Systém redukce šumu: Dolby B; Dolby C; Dolby S; HX Pro; Žádný; dbx; Jiné
ja: ノイズリダクションシステム: Dolby B; Dolby C; Dolby S; HX Pro; なし; dbx; その他
zh-CN: 降噪系统: 杜比 B; 杜比 C; 杜比 S; HX Pro; 无; dbx; 其他
en: Noise reduction system: Dolby B; Dolby C; Dolby S; HX Pro; None; dbx; Other
ru: Система шумоподавления: Dolby B; Dolby C; Dolby S; HX Pro; Нет; dbx; Другой
lt-LT: Triukšmo mažinimo sistema: Dolby B; Dolby C; Dolby S; HX Pro; Nėra; dbx; Kita
sk-SK: Systém zníženia hluku: Dolby B; Dolby C; Dolby S; HX Pro; Žiadny; dbx; Iné
tr: Gürültü azaltma sistemi: Dolby B; Dolby C; Dolby S; HX Pro; Hiçbiri; dbx; Diğer
fi: Kohinanvaimennusjärjestelmä: Dolby B; Dolby C; Dolby S; HX Pro; Ei mitään; dbx; Muu
es: Sistema de reducción de ruido: Dolby B; Dolby C; Dolby S; HX Pro; Ninguno; dbx; Otros
zh-TW: 降噪系統: Dolby B; Dolby C; Dolby S; HX Pro; 無; dbx; 其他
nb: Støyreduksjonssystem: Dolby B; Dolby C; Dolby S; HX Pro; Ingen; dbx; Annet
sv: Brusreduceringssystem: Dolby B; Dolby C; Dolby S; HX Pro; Inga; dbx; Övrigt
pl: System redukcji szumów: Dolby B; Dolby C; Dolby S; HX Pro; Brak; dbx; Inne
de: Rauschunterdrückungssystem: Dolby B; Dolby C; Dolby S; HX Pro; Keine; dbx; Sonstiges
fr: Système de réduction du bruit: Dolby B; Dolby C; Dolby S; HX Pro; Aucune; dbx; Autre
ko: 노이즈 감소 시스템: Dolby B; Dolby C; Dolby S; HX Pro; 없음; dbx; 기타
hu: Zajcsökkentő rendszer: Dolby B; Dolby C; Dolby S; HX Pro; Egyik sem; dbx; Egyéb
ro-RO: Sistem de reducere a zgomotului: Dolby B; Dolby C; Dolby S; HX Pro; Niciuna; dbx; Altele
bg-BG: Система за намаляване на шума: Dolby B; Dolby C; Dolby S; HX Pro; Няма; dbx; Други
da: Støjreduktionssystem: Dolby B; Dolby C; Dolby S; HX Pro; Ingen; dbx; Andet
sl-SI: Sistem zmanjšanja hrupa: Dolby B; Dolby C; Dolby S; HX Pro; Brez; dbx; Drugo
vi: Hệ thống giảm tiếng ồn: Dolby B; Dolby C; Dolby S; HX Pro; Không có; dbx; Khác
it: Sistema di riduzione del rumore: Dolby B; Dolby C; Dolby S; HX Pro; Nessuna; dbx; Altro
pt-BR: Sistema de redução de ruído: Dolby B; Dolby C; Dolby S; HX Pro; Nenhum; dbx; Outro
el: Σύστημα μείωσης θορύβου: Dolby B; Dolby C; Dolby S; HX Pro; Καμία; dbx; Άλλο